Tennessee, session 114, SB2179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-11-105, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (b) and redesignating the existing subsection (b) as
subsection (c):
(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds approved to be disbursed to a
nonprofit organization for statewide, regional, or local opioid abatement and remediation
purposes must be disbursed as a combination of advance payment and reimbursement
grants. It is the legislative intent that the advance payment grants comprise
approximately fifty percent (50%) of the grant funds disbursed to the nonprofit
organization and be used for recurring expenses, including employee wages and
salaries.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2179
009217
- 1 -